Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.070

Bona fide political party. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Bona fide political party" means:

(1) An organization that has been recognized as a minor political party by the secretary of state;

(2) The governing body of the state organization of a major political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or

(3) The county central committee or legislative district committee of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district committee for each party in each legislative district.

[ 2024 c 164 s 207.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.